Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1207.01
Agency head; designate records officer; duties.

In addition to the duties enumerated in section 84-1207, each state agency head shall designate a records officer from the management or professional level who shall be responsible for the overall coordination of records management activities within the agency.

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 2.